Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-1301 to 86-1312 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act.

Laws 2021, LB388, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1031, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 44.
July 18, 2026